Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201744-3001
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-3001 to 44-3006 shall be known and may be cited as the Unclaimed Life Insurance Benefits Act.

Laws 2017, LB137, § 1.
January 1, 2018